apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ਅਆਇਈਉਊਏਐਓਔਕਚਟਤਪਯ੍ਸ਼ਰਫਥਠਛਖਗਘਙਖ਼ਗ਼ਞਝਜਠਛਠਡਢਣੜਲ਼ਨਧਦਬਭਮਫ਼ਜ਼ੵਵਲਰਸ਼ਸਹੑ਼ਾੀੂੈੌੋੁਿੰੱਁਂਃ੧੨੩੪੫੬੯੮੭੦☬ੴ॥।ੱ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
  	<sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
  	<sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
  	<sdef n="top"     c="Topological"/>
  	<sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>	
  	<sdef n="org"     c="Organisation"/>
  	<sdef n="al"     c="Altres"/>

    <sdef n="post"    c="PostPosition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="gna"     c="verbal adverb"/>
    <sdef n="inj"     c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="agnt"    c="agentive"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>     
  	<sdef n="frm"	    c="formal"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="present indicative"/>	 	 

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>        
    <sdef n="cnjun"   c="Undecided conjunction"/>  
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>  

    <sdef n="mf"      c="Both Genders"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Direct/Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="abl"     c="Ablative"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>
    <sdef n="loc"     c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="erg"     c="Ergative"/>        
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/> 

    <sdef n="p1"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c=""/>
  
    <sdef n="ord"     c="ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="number/cardinal"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"    c=""/>     
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>     

    <sdef n="perf"    c="Perfective participle"/> 
    <sdef n="impf"    c="Imperfective participle"/>

    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/> 
    <sdef n="fut"     c="Future"/>

    <sdef n="iv"      c="intransitive"/>
    <sdef n="tv"      c="transitive"/> 	

    <sdef n="prs"     c="Subjunctive"/>

    <sdef n="aa"      c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="nn"      c="Inanimate"/>       
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>     
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>

    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"   c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"   c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/>

    <sdef n="prox"    c="Proximate"/>
    <sdef n="dist"    c="Distant"/>  

    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ins"     c="instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>    
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>  
    <sdef n="qnt"     c=""/>              
    <sdef n="stem"    c="stem"/>

    <sdef n="mfn"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c=""/>        
    <sdef n="percent"  c="Percent"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

  <!-- SECTION: Paradigms -->

  <!-- SECTION: Paradigm Nouns -->     
    
    <pardef n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np">
      <e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="ਮੈਰੀ__np">
      <e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਭਾਰਤ__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਟਾਟਾ__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਉਤ੍ਤਰ__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->  

    <pardef n="__abbr">
      <!-- etc -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਈ</l><r>ਈ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਈ.</l><r>ਈ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <!-- <e>     <p><l>आदी</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e> -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਡੀ</l><r>ਡੀ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਡੀ.</l><r>ਡੀ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      
      <!-- doctor -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਡਾ</l><r>ਡਾ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਡਾ.</l><r>ਡਾ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- m -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਮੀ</l><r>ਮੀ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਮੀ.</l><r>ਮੀ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- km -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਕਿਮੀ</l><r>ਕਿਮੀ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਕਿਮੀ.</l><r>ਕਿਮੀ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- father -->
      <!-- <e>     <p><l>फ्र</l><r>फ्र.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>फ्र.</l><r>फ्र.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e> -->

      <!-- rupee -->
      <!-- <e>     <p><l>रु</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>रु.</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e> -->

      <!-- pH (wot) -->
      <!-- <e>     <p><l>पीएच</l><r>पीएच.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>पीएच.</l><r>पीएच.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e> -->

      <!-- EESVI -->
      <!-- <e>     <p><l>ई</l><r>ई.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई.</l><r>ई.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e> -->

      <!-- S -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਸ</l><r>ਸ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਸ.</l><r>ਸ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- SHREEMAN -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਸ਼੍ਰੀ</l><r>ਸ਼੍ਰੀ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਸ਼੍ਰੀ.</l><r>ਸ਼੍ਰੀ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- A -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਏ</l><r>ਏ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਏ.</l><r>ਏ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- B -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਬੀ</l><r>ਬੀ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਬੀ.</l><r>ਬੀ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- L -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਐਲ</l><r>ਐਲ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਐਲ.</l><r>ਐਲ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- M -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਐਮ</l><r>ਐਮ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਐਮ.</l><r>ਐਮ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- N -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਐਨ</l><r>ਐਨ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਐਨ.</l><r>ਐਨ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- O -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਓ</l><r>ਓ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਓ.</l><r>ਓ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- R -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਆਰ</l><r>ਆਰ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਆਰ.</l><r>ਆਰ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- S -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਐਸ</l><r>ਐਸ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਐਸ.</l><r>ਐਸ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- T -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਟੀ</l><r>ਟੀ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਟੀ.</l><r>ਟੀ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- U -->
      <e>     <p><l>ਯੂ</l><r>ਯੂ<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ਯੂ.</l><r>ਯੂ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- EESAA PURVI -->
      <!-- <e>     <p><l>ई पू</l><r>ई. पू.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई. पू</l><r>ई. पू.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e> -->

    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਦਾਮੋਦਰ"><i>ਦਾਮੋਦਰ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜ਼ਸ੍ਵਿਨ੍ਦੇਰ੍"><i>ਜ਼ਸ੍ਵਿਨ੍ਦੇਰ੍</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੋਦੀ"><i>ਮੋਦੀ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਚਾਰ੍ਲ੍ਸ"><i>ਚਾਰ੍ਲ੍ਸ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਰ੍ਬਾਬ"><i>ਅਰ੍ਬਾਬ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਾਦ"><i>ਸਾਦ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਜ਼ੀਰ"><i>ਨਜ਼ੀਰ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੋਸੀ"><i>ਮੋਸੀ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਬ੍ਬਾਸ"><i>ਅਬ੍ਬਾਸ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਛਤ੍ਰਪਤਿ"><i>ਛਤ੍ਰਪਤਿ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਾਰ੍ਲ"><i>ਕਾਰ੍ਲ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੀਟਰ ਮਹਾਨ"><i>ਪੀਟਰ ਮਹਾਨ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਭਰਤ"><i>ਭਰਤ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਬ੍ਦੁਲ"><i>ਅਬ੍ਦੁਲ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਡੀਰਾਕ"><i>ਡੀਰਾਕ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕੁਨ੍ਤੀ"><i>ਕੁਨ੍ਤੀ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਹਿਲੇਰੀ"><i>ਹਿਲੇਰੀ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੁਮਤਾਜ਼"><i>ਮੁਮਤਾਜ਼</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਾਰ੍ਵਤੀ"><i>ਪਾਰ੍ਵਤੀ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ਼ੇਰਿਲ"><i>ਸ਼ੇਰਿਲ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦ੍ਰੌਪਦੀ"><i>ਦ੍ਰੌਪਦੀ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਹਾਦੇਵੀ"><i>ਮਹਾਦੇਵੀ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵੈਸ਼ਾਲੀ"><i>ਵੈਸ਼ਾਲੀ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਾਂ ਅਨ੍ਨਪੂਰ੍ਣਾ"><i>ਮਾਂ<b/>ਅਨ੍ਨਪੂਰ੍ਣਾ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਾਧਾ"><i>ਰਾਧਾ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਲਕ੍ਸ਼੍ਮੀਬਾਈ"><i>ਲਕ੍ਸ਼੍ਮੀਬਾਈ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਐਸ਼੍ਵਰ੍ਯਾ"><i>ਐਸ਼੍ਵਰ੍ਯਾ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੈਰੀ"><i>ਮੈਰੀ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਆਈਸ਼ਾ"><i>ਆਈਸ਼ਾ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜ਼ੋਹਰਾ"><i>ਜ਼ੋਹਰਾ</i><par n="ਮੈਰੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ਼ਾਸ੍ਤ੍ਰੀ"><i>ਸ਼ਾਸ੍ਤ੍ਰੀ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਹਿਟਲਰ"><i>ਹਿਟਲਰ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜੈਨ"><i>ਜੈਨ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਫ਼ੀ"><i>ਰਫ਼ੀ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਲਾਮ"><i>ਕਲਾਮ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ੍ਲਿਮ"><i>ਸ੍ਲਿਮ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਗੇਟ੍ਸ"><i>ਗੇਟ੍ਸ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਆਜ਼ਾਦ"><i>ਆਜ਼ਾਦ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਾਵ"><i>ਰਾਵ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ਼੍ਰੀਵਾਸ੍ਤਵ"><i>ਸ਼੍ਰੀਵਾਸ੍ਤਵ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੌਰ੍ਯ"><i>ਮੌਰ੍ਯ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਟੈਗੋਰ"><i>ਟੈਗੋਰ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ਼ਵਾਰਜ਼ਚਿਲਡ"><i>ਸ਼ਵਾਰਜ਼ਚਿਲਡ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੁਮਤਾਜ"><i>ਮੁਮਤਾਜ</i><par n="ਮੋਟਲਾਨੀ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੋਜਿਲ੍ਲਾ"><i>ਮੋਜਿਲ੍ਲਾ</i><par n="ਟਾਟਾ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਟਾਟਾ"><i>ਟਾਟਾ</i><par n="ਟਾਟਾ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਾਲੀਵੁੱਡ"><i>ਬਾਲੀਵੁੱਡ</i><par n="ਟਾਟਾ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ਼੍ਰੋਮਣੀ"><i>ਸ਼੍ਰੋਮਣੀ</i><par n="ਟਾਟਾ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇਸਪੇਰਾਨਤੋ"><i>ਇਸਪੇਰਾਨਤੋ</i><par n="ਟਾਟਾ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਉਤ੍ਤਰ"><i>ਉਤ੍ਤਰ</i><par n="ਉਤ੍ਤਰ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦਕ੍ਸ਼ਿਣ"><i>ਦਕ੍ਸ਼ਿਣ</i><par n="ਉਤ੍ਤਰ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੱਖਣ"><i>ਦੱਖਣ</i><par n="ਉਤ੍ਤਰ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਸ਼੍ਚਿਮ"><i>ਪਸ਼੍ਚਿਮ</i><par n="ਉਤ੍ਤਰ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੱਛਮ"><i>ਪੱਛਮ</i><par n="ਉਤ੍ਤਰ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਈਸ੍ਟ"><i>ਈਸ੍ਟ</i><par n="ਉਤ੍ਤਰ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਉੱਤਰ"><i>ਉੱਤਰ</i><par n="ਉਤ੍ਤਰ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇਰਾਨ"><i>ਇਰਾਨ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਖੁਰਾਸਾਨ"><i>ਖੁਰਾਸਾਨ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦਿੱਲੀ"><i>ਦਿੱਲੀ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਸਰਾ"><i>ਬਸਰਾ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਯੂਰਪ"><i>ਯੂਰਪ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੰਤ-ਗਰਮੇਨ"><i>ਸੰਤ-ਗਰਮੇਨ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜਲੰਧਰ"><i>ਜਲੰਧਰ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਫ਼ਤਹਿਗੜ੍ਹ"><i>ਫ਼ਤਹਿਗੜ੍ਹ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬ੍ਰਾਜ਼ੀਲ"><i>ਬ੍ਰਾਜ਼ੀਲ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕੇਰਨੂਲੂ"><i>ਕੇਰਨੂਲੂ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬੇਨਿਨ"><i>ਬੇਨਿਨ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨੌਰੂ"><i>ਨੌਰੂ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਗੰਗਟੋਕ"><i>ਗੰਗਟੋਕ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੰਯੂਕਤ ਅਰਬ ਅਮੀਰਾਤ"><i>ਸੰਯੂਕਤ<b/>ਅਰਬ<b/>ਅਮੀਰਾਤ</i><par n="ਭਾਰਤ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਡਾ"><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ਼੍ਰੀ"><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਏ"><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬੀ"><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਟੀ"><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਐਮ"><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਆਰ"><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਐਨ."><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਐਸ."><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਿਮੀ."><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੀ."><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ."><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਓ."><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ਯੂ."><i></i><par n="__abbr"/></e>
